Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.150

Out-of-state private security guards operating across state lines.

Private security guards or armed private security guards whose duties require them to operate across state lines may operate in this state if they are properly registered and certified in another state with training, insurance, and certification requirements that the director finds are at least equal to the requirements of this state.

[ 1991 c 334 s 15.]